Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB1261.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The definitions of "career emergency medical services," "invalid coach" and "volunteer EMS company" in section 7802 of Title 35 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes are amended to read:SECTION 1. SECTION 7364(A), (B) AND (B.1) OF TITLE 35 OF THE PENNSYLVANIA CONSOLIDATED STATUTES ARE AMENDED TO READ:§ 7364. ASSISTANCE TO FIRE COMPANIES AND EMS COMPANIES.<--<--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324 (A) GENERAL RULE.--THE OFFICE IS AUTHORIZED, UPON APPLICATION OF ANY FIRE COMPANY OR EMS COMPANY, TO MAKE LOANS FOR THE FOLLOWING PURPOSES:(1) ESTABLISHING OR MODERNIZING FACILITIES THAT HOUSE FIREFIGHTING EQUIPMENT, AMBULANCE OR RESCUE VEHICLES. THE AMOUNT OF A LOAN FOR ESTABLISHING OR MODERNIZING FACILITIES MADE TO ANY ONE FIRE COMPANY OR EMS COMPANY SHALL NOT EXCEED 50% OF THE TOTAL COST OF THE FACILITIES OR MODERNIZATION OR [$450,000] $750,000, WHICHEVER IS LESS, AND A NOTARIZED FINANCIAL STATEMENT FILED UNDER SUBSECTION (C) SHALL SHOW THAT THE APPLICANT HAS AVAILABLE 20% OF THE TOTAL COST OF THE FACILITIES IN UNOBLIGATED FUNDS. PROCEEDS OF THE LOAN SHALL BE USED ONLY FOR PURPOSES OF STRUCTURE OR LAND ACQUISITION OR RENOVATION OR CONSTRUCTION AND SHALL NOT BE USED FOR PAYMENT OF FEES FOR DESIGN, PLANNING, PREPARATION OF APPLICATIONS OR ANY OTHER COST NOT DIRECTLY ATTRIBUTABLE TO STRUCTURE OR LAND ACQUISITION OR RENOVATION OR CONSTRUCTION.(2) PURCHASING FIREFIGHTING APPARATUS, AMBULANCES OR RESCUE VEHICLES. THE AMOUNT OF A LOAN MADE FOR PURCHASING FIREFIGHTING APPARATUS TO ANY ONE FIRE COMPANY SHALL NOT EXCEED [$250,000] $375,000 FOR ANY SINGLE FIREFIGHTING APPARATUS EQUIPMENT OR UTILITY OR SPECIAL SERVICE VEHICLE OR HEAVY DUTY RESCUE VEHICLE AS DEFINED BY REGULATION OR GUIDELINE, OR 50% OF THE TOTAL COST OF THE EQUIPMENT OR VEHICLE, WHICHEVER IS LESS, EXCEPT FOR LOANS FOR AERIAL APPARATUS AS DEFINED BY REGULATION OR GUIDELINE, WHICH SHALL NOT EXCEED [$350,000] $750,000. THE AMOUNT OF A LOAN MADE TO ANY ONE FIRE COMPANY OR EMS COMPANY FOR ANY AMBULANCE OR LIGHT DUTY RESCUE VEHICLE AS DEFINED BY REGULATION OR GUIDELINE SHALL NOT EXCEED [$125,000] $200,000 AND FOR A 20260SB1261PN1625 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 WATERCRAFT RESCUE VEHICLE SHALL NOT EXCEED [$35,000] $75,000 OR 50% OF THE COST OF THE AMBULANCE OR RESCUE VEHICLE, WHICHEVER IS LESS, AND A NOTARIZED FINANCIAL STATEMENT FILED UNDER SUBSECTION (C) SHALL SHOW THAT THE APPLICANT HAS AVAILABLE 20% OF THE TOTAL COST OF THE VEHICLE IN UNOBLIGATED FUNDS.(3) PURCHASING PROTECTIVE, ACCESSORY OR COMMUNICATION EQUIPMENT. NO FIRE COMPANY OR EMS COMPANY SHALL RECEIVE A LOAN FOR PROTECTIVE, ACCESSORY OR COMMUNICATIVE EQUIPMENT MORE THAN ONCE IN ANY FIVE-YEAR PERIOD. EACH FIRE COMPANY OR EMS COMPANY MAY APPLY FOR A LOAN FOR A MOBILE AND PORTABLE RADIO UNIT FOR EACH EXISTING SERVICEABLE APPARATUS EQUIPMENT, AMBULANCE OR RESCUE VEHICLE. RADIO EQUIPMENT OBTAINED THROUGH LOANS UNDER THIS SUBCHAPTER SHALL BE EQUIPPED WITH A FREQUENCY OR FREQUENCIES LICENSED BY THE FEDERAL COMMUNICATIONS COMMISSION FOR FIREFIGHTING OR EMERGENCY RESPONSE PURPOSES. PROTECTIVE EQUIPMENT OBTAINED THROUGH LOANS UNDER THIS SUBCHAPTER SHALL MEET STANDARDS ADOPTED BY THE COMMISSIONER TO ENSURE THAT THE PROTECTIVE EQUIPMENT DOES NOT CONTAIN PER- AND POLYFLUOROALKYL SUBSTANCES (PFAS). A NOTARIZED FINANCIAL STATEMENT SHALL BE FILED AND LOANS UNDER THIS SUBCHAPTER FOR THE PURCHASE OF PROTECTIVE, ACCESSORY OR COMMUNICATIVE EQUIPMENT SHALL NOT EXCEED [$25,000] $100,000.(4) REFINANCING DEBT INCURRED OR CONTRACTS ENTERED INTO AFTER NOVEMBER 4, 1975, AND USED FOR THE PURCHASE OF APPARATUS EQUIPMENT OR FOR THE CONSTRUCTION OR MODERNIZATION OF FACILITIES OR FOR MODIFICATION OF APPARATUS EQUIPMENT IN ORDER TO COMPLY WITH NATIONAL FIRE PROTECTION ASSOCIATION STANDARDS.(5) REPAIR OR REHABILITATION OF APPARATUS EQUIPMENT. 20260SB1261PN1625 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 WHERE IT HAS BEEN DETERMINED THAT EXISTING APPARATUS EQUIPMENT NO LONGER MEETS THE STANDARDS OF THE NATIONAL FIRE PROTECTION ASSOCIATION AND THE REPAIR OR REHABILITATION OF SUCH EQUIPMENT WILL BRING IT IN COMPLIANCE WITH NATIONAL FIRE PROTECTION ASSOCIATION STANDARDS, LOANS FOR THE REPAIR OR REHABILITATION FOR A SINGLE APPARATUS EQUIPMENT SHALL BE FOR AT LEAST $3,000 BUT SHALL NOT EXCEED THE LESSER OF [$80,000] $150,000 OR 80% OF THE TOTAL COST OF REPAIR OR REHABILITATION.(6) PURCHASING OF USED FIREFIGHTING APPARATUS, EQUIPMENT, USED AMBULANCES, USED RESCUE VEHICLES, USED COMMUNICATIONS EQUIPMENT, USED ACCESSORY EQUIPMENT OR USED PROTECTIVE EQUIPMENT, EXCEPT THAT THE USED VEHICLES AND EQUIPMENT SHALL MEET THE NATIONAL FIRE PROTECTION ASSOCIATION (NFPA) STANDARDS AND LOANS FOR THE PURCHASE OF A USED SINGLE APPARATUS EQUIPMENT SHALL NOT EXCEED [$200,000] $300,000 OR 80% OF THE TOTAL COST OF THE EQUIPMENT, WHICHEVER IS LESS.* * *(B) LOANS.--LOANS MADE BY THE OFFICE IN THE AMOUNT OF $50,000 OR LESS SHALL BE FOR A PERIOD OF NOT MORE THAN TEN YEARS. LOANS IN EXCESS OF $50,000 BUT NOT IN EXCESS OF $300,000 SHALL BE FOR A PERIOD OF NOT MORE THAN [15] 20 YEARS. THE PAYBACK PERIOD OF ANY LOAN IN EXCESS OF $300,000 SHALL NOT EXCEED [20] 30 YEARS. LOANS SHALL BE SUBJECT TO THE PAYMENT OF INTEREST AT 2% PER YEAR AND SHALL BE SUBJECT TO SUCH SECURITY AS SHALL BE DETERMINED BY THE COMMISSIONER. THE TOTAL AMOUNT OF INTEREST EARNED BY THE INVESTMENT OR REINVESTMENT OF ALL OR ANY PART OF THE PRINCIPAL OF ANY LOAN SHALL BE RETURNED TO THE OFFICE AND TRANSFERRED TO THE FIRE AND EMERGENCY MEDICAL SERVICES LOAN FUND AND SHALL NOT BE CREDITED AS PAYMENT OF 20260SB1261PN1625 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 PRINCIPAL OR INTEREST ON THE LOAN. EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN SUBSECTION (A)(5) AND (7), THE MINIMUM AMOUNT OF ANY LOAN SHALL BE $25,000.(B.1) INFLATION ADJUSTMENT.--BEGINNING [ONE YEAR AFTER THE EFFECTIVE DATE OF THIS SUBSECTION AND BIANNUALLY] JANUARY 1, 2028, AND ANNUALLY THEREAFTER, ALL LOAN LIMITS UNDER THIS SECTION SHALL INCREASE AT THE RATE OF INFLATION AS OUTLINED IN THE CONSUMER PRICE INDEX FOR ALL URBAN CONSUMERS FOR THE PHILADELPHIA-CAMDEN-WILMINGTON, PA-NJ-DE-MD AREA FOR THE MOST RECENT 12-MONTH PERIOD FOR WHICH THE FIGURES HAVE BEEN REPORTED BY THE UNITED STATES DEPARTMENT OF LABOR, BUREAU OF LABOR STATISTICS. IF THE RATE OF INFLATION DOES NOT INCREASE, ALL LOAN LIMITS SHALL REMAIN THE SAME AS THEY WERE FOR THE PREVIOUS YEAR. THE OFFICE SHALL TRANSMIT NOTICE OF LOAN LIMIT INCREASES TO THE LEGISLATIVE REFERENCE BUREAU FOR PUBLICATION IN THE PENNSYLVANIA BULLETIN.* * *SECTION 2. THE DEFINITIONS OF "CAREER EMERGENCY MEDICAL SERVICES," "INVALID COACH" AND "VOLUNTEER EMS COMPANY" IN SECTION 7802 OF TITLE 35 ARE AMENDED TO READ:§ 7802. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this chapter shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:* * *"Career emergency medical services." As follows:(1) A for-profit chartered emergency medical service corporation, association or organization which meets all of the following:(i) Is located in this Commonwealth.20260SB1261PN1625 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (ii) Is licensed by the Department of Health.(iii) Is not associated or affiliated with a hospital, unless recognized in accordance with section 7823(b.1) (relating to award of grants).(iv) Is regularly engaged in the provision of emergency medical services, including basic life support or advanced life support services and advanced life support squads as defined in 28 Pa. Code § 1027.1 (relating to general provisions).(2) The term shall not include a corporation, association or organization that is primarily engaged in the [operation of invalid coaches which are intended for the] routine transport of individuals who are convalescent or nonambulatory and who do not ordinarily require emergency medical treatment while in transit.* * * ["Invalid coach." The term shall have the meaning given to it in Chapter 81 (relating to emergency medical services system).]"Volunteer EMS company." Any nonprofit chartered corporation, association or organization located in this Commonwealth, which is licensed by the Department of Health and is not associated or affiliated with any hospital, unless recognized in accordance with section 7823(b.1) (relating to award of grants), and which is regularly engaged in the provision of emergency medical services, including basic life support or advanced life support services and advanced life support squads as defined in 28 Pa. Code § 1027.1 (relating to general provisions). The term shall not include any corporation, association or organization that is primarily engaged in the 20260SB1261PN1625 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 [operation of invalid coaches which are intended for the] routine transport of persons who are convalescent or otherwise nonambulatory and do not ordinarily require emergency medical treatment while in transit.* * *Section 2 3. Section 7812 of Title 35 is amended to read:§ 7812. Publication and notice.The commissioner shall publish notice of the grant program availability through the Legislative Reference Bureau for publication in the Pennsylvania Bulletin by August 8 for each fiscal year. The commissioner shall post a notice of the grant program and application for the grant program on the Office of the State Fire Commissioner's publicly accessible Internet website. To the greatest extent possible, the commissioner shall utilize the Commonwealth's Electronic Single Application for Assistance.Section 3 4. Section 7813(a)(7), (a.2), (d) and (e) introductory paragraph and (2)(i) of Title 35 are amended and the section is amended by adding a subsection to read:§ 7813. Award of grants.(a) Authorization.--The commissioner is authorized to make a grant award to each eligible fire company for the following:* * *[(7) Revenue loss for grants issued in 2021 and 2022.]* * *[(a.2) Additional grants.--Each fire company with not more than 20 members who are certified by the National Board on Fire Service Professional Qualifications or by the International Fire Service Accreditation Congress and are verified by the Pennsylvania State Fire Academy at a minimum level of 20260SB1261PN1625 - 7 - <--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Firefighter 1 on or before July 1 of the year of the grant application shall be eligible to receive additional grants under a certification bonus point system as administered by the commissioner.](a.3) Additional grants.--The commissioner may establish a certification bonus point system to award additional grants to fire companies. The commissioner shall submit the certification bonus point system to the Legislative Reference Bureau for publication in the next available issue of the Pennsylvania Bulletin concurrently with the notice required under section 7812 (relating to publication and notice).* * *(d) Eligibility.--To receive grant funds under this chapter, a fire company must:(1) Have actively responded to at least 15 fire or rescue emergencies during the previous calendar year.(2) Be actively participating in the Pennsylvania Fire Information Reporting System under a signed agreement. The commissioner shall develop and publish guidelines specifying the criteria necessary to determine the level of participation in the Pennsylvania Fire Information Reporting System to remain eligible for grant funds.(3) Have on record with the commissioner up-to-date point-of-contact information for the fire company or municipality , including mailing address, telephone number and email addresses. The fire company must submit the information required under this paragraph no later than July 31 of the year of the grant application.(4) Be registered with the appropriate public safety answering point as an active response agency.20260SB1261PN1625 - 8 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (5) Be designated by a municipality, by resolution or ordinance, as a provider of fire or rescue services within the municipality.(e) Construction Savings Account.--A fire company may apply for a grant under subsection (a) for the purpose of constructing or renovating a new facility. The grant shall be deposited into the Construction Savings Account, which is established within the State Treasury. Money in the Construction Savings Account may be withdrawn by application of the fire company. The Construction Savings Account shall be administered by the commissioner. The following shall apply:* * *(2) For a fire company to withdraw money from the Construction Savings Account:(i) The application shall contain the signatures of two duly elected officers of the fire company or municipality.* * *Section 4 5. Sections 7814 and 7822 of Title 35 are amended to read:§ 7814. Consolidation incentive.If two or more [volunteer] fire companies consolidate their use of facilities, equipment, firefighters and services, the consolidated entity may, upon notification of the commissioner, be eligible for a reduction of the interest rate payable on any outstanding principal balance owed, as of the date of consolidation, by any or all of the consolidating companies to the Fire and Emergency Medical Services Loan Fund for loans made under the act of July 15, 1976 (P.L.1036, No.208), known as the Volunteer Fire Company, Ambulance Service and Rescue Squad 20260SB1261PN1625 - 9 - <--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Assistance Act, or under Subchapter E of Chapter 73 (relating to Fire and Emergency Medical Services Loan Program). The reduction in the interest rate payable shall be from 2% to 1%. Upon receipt of such notification, the commissioner shall determine and verify that the consolidated entity is in fact a bona fide consolidated [volunteer] fire company. If the commissioner determines that the consolidated entity is a bona fide consolidated [volunteer] fire company, the commissioner shall reduce the interest rate payable on any outstanding principal balance owed to the Fire and Emergency Medical Services Loan Fund for loans made under the former Volunteer Fire Company, Ambulance Service and Rescue Squad Assistance Act, or under Subchapter E of Chapter 73, for which the consolidating companies or the consolidated entity may be individually or jointly responsible. The commissioner may promulgate such rules and regulations as may be necessary to carry out the provisions of this section.§ 7822. Publication and notice.The commissioner shall publish notice of the grant program availability through the Legislative Reference Bureau for publication in the Pennsylvania Bulletin by August 8 for each fiscal year. To the greatest extent possible, the commissioner shall utilize the Commonwealth's Electronic Single Application for Assistance.Section 5 6. Section 7823(a)(7) of Title 35 is amended and the section is amended by adding a subsection to read:§ 7823. Award of grants.(a) Authorization.--The commissioner is authorized to make a grant award to each eligible EMS company for the following:* * *20260SB1261PN1625 - 10 - <--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 [(7) Revenue loss for grants issued in 2021 and 2022.](a.1) Additional grants.--The commissioner, in consultation with the Bureau of Emergency Medical Services, may establish a certification bonus point system to award additional grants to EMS companies. The commissioner shall submit the certification bonus point system to the Legislative Reference Bureau for publication in the next available issue of the Pennsylvania Bulletin concurrently with the notice required under section 7822 (relating to publication and notice).* * *Section 6 7. Subchapter C.1 of Chapter 78, section 7832.2, Subchapter E of Chapter 78 and sections 7892 and 7893 of Title 35 are repealed:[SUBCHAPTER C.1COVID-19 CRISIS FIRE COMPANY ANDEMERGENCY MEDICAL SERVICES GRANT PROGRAMSec.7827.1. Establishment.7827.2. Publication and notice.7827.3. Award of grants.§ 7827.1. Establishment.The COVID-19 Crisis Fire Company and Emergency Medical Services Grant Program is established and shall be administered by the agency. Grants provided under the program shall be used by fire companies and EMS companies to provide services during the novel coronavirus pandemic as identified in the proclamation of disaster emergency issued by the Governor on March 6, 2020, published at 50 Pa.B. 1644 (March 21, 2020), and any renewal of the state of disaster emergency.§ 7827.2. Publication and notice.20260SB1261PN1625 - 11 - <--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 The agency shall transmit notice of the COVID-19 Crisis Fire Company and Emergency Medical Services Grant Program availability to the Legislative Reference Bureau for publication in the Pennsylvania Bulletin within 30 days of the effective date of this section.§ 7827.3. Award of grants.(a) Authorization.--The agency shall make a grant award from the COVID-19 Crisis Fire Company and Emergency Medical Services Grant Program to:(1) Each eligible fire company that received a grant award in fiscal year 2019-2020 under section 7813 (relating to award of grants) for the purposes under section 7813(a) and (a.1).(2) A fire company that did not apply for or receive a grant award in fiscal year 2019-2020 under section 7813 and that applies for a grant under this subchapter for the purposes under section 7813(a) and (a.1).(3) Each eligible EMS company that received a grant award in fiscal year 2019-2020 under section 7823 (relating to award of grants) for the purposes under section 7823(a).(4) An EMS company that did not apply for or receive a grant award in fiscal year 2019-2020 under section 7823 and that applies for a grant under this subchapter for the purposes under section 7823(a).(b) Amount of award.--The amount of the grant award under this subchapter shall be the same amount of the grant award for fiscal year 2019-2020 to:(1) An eligible fire company under section 7813.(2) An eligible EMS company under section 7823.(c) Application not required.--20260SB1261PN1625 - 12 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (1) Except as otherwise provided in paragraph (2), no additional application shall be required for a grant under this subchapter.(2) A fire company under subsection (a)(2) and an EMS company under subsection (a)(4) must file an application for a grant under this subchapter.§ 7832.2. COVID-19 Crisis Fire Company and Emergency Medical Services Grant Program.The following shall apply to any appropriation from money received by the Commonwealth under the Coronavirus Aid, Relief, and Economic Security Act (Public Law 116-136, 134 Stat. 281) for purposes of making grants under Subchapter C.1 (relating to COVID-19 Crisis Fire Company and Emergency Medical Services Grant Program):(1) The sum of $44,000,000 of the amount appropriated shall be expended for the purpose of making grants to eligible fire companies.(2) The sum of $6,000,000 of the amount appropriated shall be expended for the purpose of making grants to eligible EMS companies.(3) Notwithstanding paragraphs (1) and (2), the agency may use up to $200,000 of unencumbered funds from the amount appropriated for administrative costs for the implementation of Subchapter C.1.SUBCHAPTER EEMERGENCY MEDICAL SERVICESCOVID-19 RECOVERY GRANT PROGRAMSec.7841. Establishment.7842. Award of grants.20260SB1261PN1625 - 13 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 7843. Funding and costs.7844. Report.§ 7841. Establishment.The Emergency Medical Services COVID-19 Recovery Grant Program is established and shall be administered by the Office of the State Fire Commissioner in consultation with the Department of Health. Grants provided under the Emergency Medical Services COVID-19 Recovery Grant Program shall be used by EMS companies to provide services in response to the novel coronavirus pandemic.§ 7842. Award of grants.(a) Application not required.--No application shall be required to receive a grant under this subchapter.(b) Notification.--The Office of the State Fire Commissioner shall notify in writing each EMS company, as defined under section 7802 (relating to definitions), of the availability of grants from the Emergency Medical Services COVID-19 Recovery Grant Program for the purposes under section 7823(a) (relating to award of grants).(c) Certification.--The Office of the State Fire Commissioner shall include with the written notification under subsection (b) a form for each eligible EMS company to certify that a grant received under this subchapter shall be used for the purposes under section 7823(a) and provide a deadline by which an EMS company must return the certification form.(d) Amount.--Grants shall be awarded under this subchapter in an amount equal to the total amount of funds appropriated under section 7843 (relating to funding and costs) less the amount used under section 7843(b) divided by the total number of EMS companies that returned the certification under subsection 20260SB1261PN1625 - 14 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (c).(e) Report.--No later than July 30, 2022, each EMS company receiving a grant award under this subchapter shall report to the Office of the State Fire Commissioner how it will use the grant money awarded under subsection (d).§ 7843. Funding and costs.(a) Appropriation.--The sum of $25,000,000 of Federal funds in the COVID-19 Response Restricted Account is appropriated to the Pennsylvania Emergency Management Agency for the Emergency Medical Services COVID-19 Recovery Grant Program under this subchapter. The provisions of section 111-C(g) of the act of April 9, 1929 (P.L.343, No.176), known as The Fiscal Code, shall not apply to the amount appropriated under this section.(b) Administrative costs.--The Office of the State Fire Commissioner may use up to $200,000 of unencumbered funds from the amount appropriated under subsection (a) for administrative costs for the implementation of this subchapter.§ 7844. Report.(a) Contents.--The commissioner shall prepare a report on the Emergency Medical Services COVID-19 Recovery Grant Program. The report shall include all of the following information:(1) The total number of EMS companies that were notified of the grant program.(2) The total number of EMS companies that submitted a certification for the grant program.(3) The total number of EMS companies that received a grant.(4) The total amount of the grant received by each EMS company.(5) A summary of how each EMS company will use the grant 20260SB1261PN1625 - 15 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 money awarded under the program.(b) Submission.--The commissioner shall submit the report by September 1, 2022, to all of the following:(1) The chair and minority chair of the Veterans Affairs and Emergency Preparedness Committee of the Senate.(2) The chair and minority chair of the Veterans Affairs and Emergency Preparedness Committee of the House of Representatives.(3) The chair and minority chair of the Appropriations Committee of the Senate.(4) The chair and minority chair of the Appropriations Committee of the House of Representatives.(c) Posting.--The commissioner shall post the annual report on the Office of the State Fire Commissioner's publicly accessible Internet website.§ 7892. Expiration of authority relating to COVID-19 Crisis Fire Company and Emergency Medical Services Grant Program.The authority of the agency to award grants under Subchapter C.1 (relating to COVID-19 Crisis Fire Company and Emergency Medical Services Grant Program) shall expire six months after the effective date of this section.§ 7893. Expiration of authority relating to Emergency Medical Services COVID-19 Recovery Grant Program.The authority of the Office of the State Fire Commissioner to award grants under Subchapter E (relating to Emergency Medical Services COVID-19 Recovery Grant Program) shall expire June 30, 2022.]Section 7 8. Section 7895(a)(5) of Title 35 is amended to read:20260SB1261PN1625 - 16 - <--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 § 7895. Annual reports.(a) Contents.--The commissioner shall prepare an annual report on the Fire Company Grant Program and Emergency Medical Services Grant Program. The annual report shall include all of the following information:* * *[(5) A list of the fire companies as delineated by county that received additional grants under section 7813(a.2) (relating to award of grants).]* * *Section 8 9. This act shall take effect in 30 days.20260SB1261PN1625 - 17 - <--1234567891011